Georgia, session 2025_26, HB703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to provide for a homestead exemption from City of Peachtree City ad valorem taxes
for municipal purposes in the amount of $5,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead
for residents of that city who are 65 years of age or over and whose income does not exceed
$30,000.00, approved May 5, 2005 (Ga. L. 2005, p. 3719), is amended by revising
subsection (b) of Section 1 as follows:
H. B. 703
- 1 -

LC 47 3442/AP
"(b) Each resident of the City of Peachtree City who is a senior citizen is granted an
exemption on that person's homestead from City of Peachtree City ad valorem taxes for
municipal purposes in the amount of $30,000.00 of the assessed value of that homestead.
The exemption granted by this subsection shall only be granted if that person's income
together with the income of the spouse who also occupies and resides at such homestead
does not exceed $60,000.00 for the immediately preceding year. The value of that property
in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation."
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The municipal election superintendent of the City of Peachtree City shall call and conduct
an election as provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors
of the City of Peachtree City for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall
conduct that election on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November, 2025, and
shall issue the call and conduct such election as provided by general law. The election
superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week
for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Fayette County.
The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
H. B. 703
- 2 -

LC 47 3442/AP
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides an expansion of the homestead
( ) NO exemption from certain City of Peachtree City ad valorem taxes for
municipal purposes in the amount of $30,000.00 of the assessed value of
that homestead for residents of the City of Peachtree City who are 65 years
of age or older, if that person's income together with the income of the
spouse who also occupies and resides at such homestead does not exceed
$60,000.00 for the immediately preceding year?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by City of Peachtree City. It
shall be the municipal election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the
Secretary of State. The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the municipal
election superintendent and are not intended as directory. If the municipal election
superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this section, any elector of the City of
Peachtree City school district may apply for a writ of mandamus to compel the municipal
election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the court finds that
the municipal election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall
fashion appropriate relief requiring the municipal election superintendent to call and conduct
such election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special
elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
H. B. 703
- 3 -

LC 47 3442/AP
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 703
- 4 -